Utah statutes.
19-1-405.   Air Quality Board duties -- Rulemaking.

(1)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Air Quality Board may make rules to:

(a)  certify a motor vehicle on which conversion equipment has been installed if:

(i)  before the installation of conversion equipment, the motor vehicle does not exceed the emission cut points for:

(A)  a transient test driving cycle, as specified in 40 CFR 51, Appendix E to Subpart S; or

(B)  an equivalent test for the make, model, and year of the motor vehicle; and

(ii)  the motor vehicle's emissions of regulated pollutants, when operating with clean fuel, is less than the emissions were before the installation of conversion equipment;

(b)  recognize a test or standard that demonstrates a reduction in emissions;

(c)  recognize a certification standard from another state;

(d)  certify a fuel, vehicle, retrofit, or fuel system if it is at least as effective in reducing air pollution as fuels under Subsection 19-1-402(1)(a) or vehicles under Subsection 19-1-402(2); or

(e)  establish criteria for determining the effectiveness of a fuel, vehicle, retrofit, or fuel system in reducing air pollution.

(2)  A reduction in emissions under Subsection (1)(a)(ii) is demonstrated by:

(a)  certification of the conversion equipment by the federal Environmental Protection Agency or by a state whose certification standards are recognized by the Air Quality Board;

(b)  testing the motor vehicle, before and after the installation of the conversion equipment, in accordance with 40 CFR 86, Control of Air Pollution from New and In-use Motor Vehicle Engines: Certification and Test Procedures, using all fuel the motor vehicle is capable of using; or

(c)  any other test or standard recognized by the Air Quality Board in rule.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

